Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB418.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 14304 of Title 16 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes, added May 8, 2024 (P.L.50, No.14), is amended to read:§ 14304. Filling of vacancies.If a vacancy occurs in the office of district attorney in a county of the second A, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, seventh or eighth class, the judges of the court of common pleas shall, upon a showing that the first assistant district attorney satisfies the requirements of section 14301 (relating to district attorney, qualifications, eligibility and compensation), appoint the first assistant district attorney to 123456789101112131415161718192021 fill the office [of district attorney and discharge the duties of the district attorney until the first Monday in January following the next municipal election occurring not less than 90 days after the occurrence of the vacancy.] for the balance of the unexpired term. If the first assistant district attorney is unwilling or unable to serve or does not satisfy the requirements of section 14301, the judges of the court of common pleas shall fill the vacancy by the appointment of a competent individual who satisfies the requirements of section 14301 to fill the office [until the first Monday in January following the next municipal election occurring not less than 90 days after the occurrence of the vacancy.] for the balance of the unexpired term.Section 2. Sections 2962(a)(11) and 3132(b) of Title 53 are amended to read:§ 2962. Limitation on municipal powers.(a) Powers granted by statute.--With respect to the following subjects, the home rule charter shall not give any power or authority to the municipality contrary to or in limitation or enlargement of powers granted by statutes which are applicable to a class or classes of municipalities:* * *(11) The office of district attorney or the procedure for the filling of vacancies in the office of district attorney.* * *§ 3132. Manner of filling vacancies in office.* * *(b) Other officers.--(1) If a vacancy occurs in the office of executive 20250SB0418PN0352 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (mayor), municipal treasurer, if elected, municipal controller, if elected, [county district attorney] or county sheriff, if elected, the municipal council shall fill the vacancy within 30 days thereafter by choosing an executive (mayor), a municipal treasurer, a municipal controller[, a county district attorney] or a county sheriff, as the case may be, to serve until his successor is elected by the qualified electors at the next municipal election occurring at least 50 days after the vacancy occurs and is duly sworn into office. The person so elected shall serve from the first Monday of January next succeeding his election for the remainder of the term of the person originally elected to the office.(2) If, by reason of a tie vote or otherwise, a vacancy in the office of executive (mayor), treasurer, controller[, county district attorney] or county sheriff has not been filled by council within the time as limited in this subsection, the court of common pleas, upon petition of ten or more qualified electors, shall fill the vacancy by the appointment of a qualified person for the portion of the unexpired term as provided in this subsection.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0418PN0352 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122